New York, session 2025-2026, A5806.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The general business law is amended by adding a new section 2 391-uu to read as follows: 3 § 391-uu. Sale or promotional distribution of covered license plate 4 frames. 1. No person, firm, corporation, partnership, association, 5 limited liability company, or other entity shall sell or offer to sell 6 or give away, as either a retail or wholesale promotion, a covered 7 license plate frame within New York state. 8 2. For purposes of this section, "covered license plate frame" means 9 any glass or plastic material, artificial or synthetic material or 10 substance that conceals or obscures a license plate or that distorts a 11 recorded or photographic image of such license plate. 12 3. Any person, firm, corporation, partnership, association, limited 13 liability company, or other entity that violates the provisions of this 14 section by selling, offering to sell, or giving away as either a retail 15 or wholesale promotion, a covered license plate frame shall be subject 16 to a civil penalty of not more than five hundred dollars per violation, 17 recoverable in an action by any enforcement authority designated by any 18 municipality or political subdivision. 19 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03103-01-5